South Dakota, session 2026, HB1262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $2,000,000 from the general fund, to the Department of
Education for the purpose of providing a grant to an eligible nonprofit organization to acquire,
renovate, and equip a facility in which the organization may offer non-residential, school-
based, therapeutic services for students receiving instruction in an alternative setting.
Section 2. A nonprofit organization is eligible for the grant under section 1 of this Act only if
the organization demonstrates experience in operating a program that offers integrated
educational and therapeutic services, in partnership with school districts and other community
systems. The nonprofit organization may not use any moneys awarded as part of the grant
to provide residential treatment, inpatient services, or twenty-four-hour care for a student.
Section 3. The secretary of the Department of Education shall approve vouchers and the
state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized in this Act.
Section 4. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 5. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in
full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.

26.962.13 2 1262
An Act to make an appropriation for a non-residential, school-based, therapeutic services
facility in Brown County and to declare an emergency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1262
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1262 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1262 ENROLLED